Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Chapter 1 Trademarks and Service Marks

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

74 Am. Jur. 2d Trademarks and Tradenames § 1 et seq.

Abandonment of trademark or trade name, 3 ALR2d 1226.

Legal aspects of television, 15 ALR2d 785.

Literary and artistic rights for purposes of, and their infringement by or in connection with, motion pictures, radio and television, 23 ALR2d 244.

Damages recoverable for wrongful registration of trademark, 26 ALR2d 1184.

Rights in union label, shop card or other insignia denoting union shop or workmanship, 42 ALR2d 709.

Punitive or exemplary damages as recoverable for trademark infringement or unfair competition, 47 ALR2d 1117.

Commercial competitor's truthful denomination of his goods as copies of designs of another, using designer's name, as trademark infringement, unfair competition or the like, 1 ALR3d 760.

Rights and remedies with respect to another's use of a deceptively similar advertising slogan, 2 ALR3d 748.

Geographical extent of protection of word or symbol under doctrine of secondary meaning, 41 ALR3d 434.

Unfair competition by imitation in sign or design of business place, 86 ALR3d 884.

Name appropriation by employer or former employer, 52 ALR4th 156.

Right to protection against appropriation of advertising matter or methods, 5 ALR Fed 625.

Modern status of pendent federal jurisdiction, under 28 USC § 1338(b), over state claim of unfair competition when joined with related claim under federal trademark laws, 62 ALR Fed 428.

Application of functionality doctrine under § 43(a) of Lanham Act (15 USC § 1125(a)), 78 ALR Fed 712.

What constitutes abandonment of trademark by conduct causing mark to lose significance as indication of origin, under § 45 of Lanham Act (15 USC § 1127(b)), 81 ALR Fed 677.

Design on recreational object as valid trademark, 82 ALR Fed 9.

What constitutes abandonment of trademark by discontinuance of use with intent not to resume it, under § 45 of Lanham Act (15 USC § 1127), 83 ALR Fed 295.

Application of secondary meaning test in action for trademark or tradename infringement under § 43(a) of the Lanham Act (15 USC § 1125(a)), 86 ALR Fed 489.

Parody as trademark or tradename infringement, 92 ALR Fed 25.

Granting of “naked” or unsupervised license to third party as abandonment of trademark, 118 ALR Fed 211.

Invalidity of copyright as defense to copyright infringement action, 141 ALR Fed 507.

“Post-sale confusion” in trademark or trade dress infringement actions under § 43 of Lanham Trademark Act (15 U.S.C. § 1125), 145 ALR Fed 407.

Application of “De Minimis Non Curat Lex” to Copyright Infringement Claims”, 150 ALR Fed 661.

When is trade dress “inherently distinctive” for purposes of trade dress infringement actions under § 43(a) of Lanham Act (15 U.S.C. § 1125(a))—Cases after Two Pesos, 161 ALR Fed 327.

87 C.J.S. Trademarks, Tradenames and Unfair Competition § 1 et seq.